Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.030

Compliance—Monitoring—Compliance enforcement.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor local school districts' compliance with this chapter, and shall establish a compliance timetable, rules, and guidelines for enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2010 c 240 s 4.]